en: Waxy potatoes
da: Fastkogende kartofler
de: Festkochende Kartoffeln
sv: Fasta potatisar

en: New potatoes
da: Nye kartofler
fi: Tuoreet perunat
fr: Pommes de terre nouvelles, Pommes de terre fraîches, Pommes de terre primeurs, Pommes de terre de primeur
hr: Mladi krumpir
nl: Nieuwe oogst aardappelen

en: Peeled potatoes
da: Skrællede kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre sans peau

en: Agata potatoes
da: Agata-kartofler
de: Agata Kartoffeln
fr: Pommes de terre Agata
hr: Agata krumpir
nl: Agata aardappelen
zh: 阿加塔土豆

en: Allians potatoes
da: Allians-kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre Allians
zh: 阿利安斯土豆

en: Almond potatoes, Mandel potatoes
fi: Puikulaperuna
la: Solanum tuberosum ‘Almond’
nb: Mandelpoteter
nn: Mandelpotetar, Mandelpoteter
sv: Mandelpotatisar
zh: 曼德尔土豆

en: Lapin Puikula
xx: Lapin puikula
fi: Lapin puikula

en: Amandine potatoes, Potatoes(Amandine)
da: Amandine-kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre amandine
nl: Amandine aardappelen, Aardappelen(Amandine)
ru: Картофель Амандин
sv: Amandinepotatisar, Potatisar (Amandine)
zh: 阿曼丁马铃薯

en: Béa potatoes
da: Béa-kartofler
de: Béa Kartoffeln
fr: Pommes de terre Béa
hr: Béa krumpir
nl: Béa aardappelen

en: Beate potatoes
da: Beate-kartofler
de: Beate Kartoffeln
hr: Beate krumpir
nb: Beate-poteter
nn: Beate-potetar, Beate-poteter
sv: Beate-potatisar, Potatisar (Beate)

en: Carolus potatoes
da: Carolus-kartofler
de: Carolus Kartoffeln
hr: Carolus krumpir
nb: Carolus-poteter
nn: Carolus-potetar, Carolus-poteter
sv: Carolus-potatisar, Potatisar (Carolus)

en: Charlotte potatoes
da: Charlotte-kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre Charlotte
hr: Charlotte krumpir
nl: Charlotte aardappel

en: Gala potatoes
da: Gala-kartofler
de: Gala Kartoffeln
fi: Gala (peruna)
hr: Gala krumpir
la: Solanum tuberosum ‘Gala’
nb: Gala-poteter
nn: Gala-potetar, Gala-poteter
sv: Gala-potatisar, Potatisar (Gala)

en: Ratte potatoes
da: Aspargeskartofler
de: Ratte Kartoffeln
fi: Ratte (peruna)
hr: Ratte krumpir
ko: 라트감자
la: Solanum tuberosum ‘Ratte’
nb: Ratte-poteter
nn: Ratte-potetar, Ratte-poteter
sv: Sparrispotatisar, Ratte-potatisar, Potatisar (Ratte)

en: Bintje potatoes
da: Bintje-kartofler
de: Bintje Kartoffeln
fr: Pomme de terre Bintje
hr: Bintje krumpir
la: Solanum tuberosum ‘Bintje’
nb: Bintje-poteter
nl: Aardappelen (Bintje), Bintje aardappelen
nn: Bintje-potetar, Bintje-poteter
sv: Bintje-potatisar, Potatisar (Bintje)

en: Ostara potatoes
da: Ostara-kartofler
fr: Pomme de terre Ostara

en: Grenaille potatoes, Potatoes (Grenaille)
da: Grenaille-kartofler
de: Grenaille Kartoffeln
fr: Pomme de terre Grenaille
hr: Grenaille krumpir
nl: Grenaille aardappelen

en: Jersey Royal potatoes
da: Jersey Royal-kartofler

en: Lady Christl potatoes
da: Lady Christl-kartofler
de: Lady Christl Kartoffeln
fr: Pomme de terre Lady Christl
hr: Lady christl krumpir
nl: Lady Christl aardappelen

en: Louisiana potatoes
da: Louisiana-kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre Louisiana